Vermont, session 2025-2026, S288.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 4255 is amended to read:
§ 4255. LICENSE FEES
(a) Vermont residents may apply for licenses on forms provided by the
Commissioner. Fees for each license shall be:
VT LEG #384987 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.288
2026 Page 2 of 4
(1) Fishing license $28.00
(2) Hunting license $28.00
(3) Combination hunting and fishing license $47.00
* * *
(6) Hunting license for persons 17 years of age or under $8.00
* * *
(8) Fishing license for persons 15 through 17 years of age $8.00
* * *
(b) Nonresidents may apply for licenses on forms provided by the
Commissioner. Fees for each license shall be:
(1) Fishing license $54.00
(2) One-day fishing license $21.00
(3) [Repealed.]
(4) Hunting license $102.00
(5) Combination hunting and fishing license $143.00
* * *
(9) Hunting licenses license for persons 17 years of age or under $25.00
* * *
(13) Fishing license for persons 15 through 17 years of age $15.00
* * *
VT LEG #384987 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.288
2026 Page 3 of 4
(15) Combination hunting and fishing license for persons 17 years of
age or under $30.00
* * *
(d)(1) A nonresident full-time student who is otherwise qualified and who
is enrolled in a program of secondary education or public or independent
school in grades nine through 12, in a college or university postsecondary
education institution, or in a postgraduate program located within the State at
which he or she has successfully completed two successive semesters shall be
entitled to purchase a resident fishing, hunting, or combination hunting and
fishing license at the same cost as a resident license upon presentation of a
student identification card or other document from a school that affirms his or
her the student’s status and payment of the fees set forth in this section,
provided the student applies for the license to an authorized license agent. A
nonresident full-time student shall, when requested, show proof of the
student’s status by furnishing a valid student identification card or other
document from a school.
(2) As used in this subsection, “full-time student” for purposes of
enrollment in a postsecondary educational institution means a student who is
registered for at least 12 credit hours per semester.
* * *
VT LEG #384987 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.288
2026 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #384987 v.1